Arkansas, session 2025, HB1674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 12, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 7 — Helping Enhance Access to Rural Treatment (HEART) Act

20-12-701. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Helping Enhance
Access to Rural Treatment (HEART) Act".

20-12-702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
*CEB020*
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
(1) “Critical access hospital” means a hospital that is
designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as a critical
access hospital and that is recognized by the Department of Health as a
critical access hospital for purposes of Medicaid;
(2) “Rural county” means a county having a population of less
than fifty thousand (50,000) according to the most recent federal decennial
census, excluding any military personnel and their dependents living in a
county that contains a military base or installation; and
(3) “Rural hospital organization” means a licensed acute care
hospital that:
(A) Either provides inpatient hospital services at a
facility located in a rural county or is a critical access hospital;
(B) Participates in both Medicaid and Medicare and accepts
both Medicaid and Medicare patients;
(C) Provides healthcare services to indigent patients;
(D) Has at least ten percent (10%) of its annual net
revenue categorized as indigent care, charity care, or bad debt;
(E) Annually files either:
(i) IRS Form 990, Return of Organization Exempt From
Income Tax, with the department; or
(ii) For any hospital not required to file IRS Form
990, the form prescribed by the department that collects the same information
as the IRS Form 990;
(F) Is operated by a county or municipal authority or is
designated as a tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as it
existed on January 1, 2025; and
(G) Is current with all audits and reports required by
law.

20-12-703. Powers and duties of Department of Health — List of
approved rural hospital organizations.
(a) The Department of Health may accept and expend any donations and
contributions received under this subchapter.
(b) The Department of Health shall:
(1) By December 1 of each year, approve a list of rural hospital
organizations eligible to receive contributions from the income tax credit
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
provided under § 26-51-518 and transmit the list to the Department of Finance
and Administration;
(2)(A) Create an operations manual for identifying rural
hospital organizations and ranking rural hospital organizations in order of
financial need.
(B) The operations manual required under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section shall include without limitation:
(i) All deadlines for rural hospital organizations
to submit the required information to the Department of Health;
(ii) The criteria to be included in the five-year
plan required under § 20-12-704 for rural hospital organizations; and
(iii) The formula applied to rank rural hospital
organizations in order of financial need;
(3) Prepare an annual report compiling the information received
under § 20-12-704 and submit it to the Chair of the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Chair of the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor; and
(4) Post the following information in a prominent location on
the Department of Health's website:
(A) The list of rural hospital organizations eligible to
receive contributions as approved under subdivision (b)(1) of this section;
(B) The operations manual required under subdivision
(b)(2) of this section;
(C) The annual report required under subdivision (b)(3) of
this section;
(D) The total amount received by each third party that
participated in soliciting, administering, or managing contributions under
this subchapter; and
(E) A link to the Department of Finance and
Administration's website containing the information required under § 26-51-
518(h).

20-12-704. Requirements for rural hospital organizations.
(a)(1) Before a rural hospital organization is included on the list
required under § 20-12-703 and is eligible to receive contributions from the
income tax credit provided under § 26-51-518, the rural hospital organization
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
shall submit to the Department of Health a five-year plan detailing the
financial viability and stability of the rural hospital organization.
(2) The criteria to be included in the five-year plan required
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be established by the
department under § 20-12-703.
(b)(1) A rural hospital organization that receives contributions under
§ 26-51-518 shall:
(A) Use the contributions received under § 26-51-518 for
the provision of healthcare-related services for residents of a rural county
or for residents of the area served by a critical access hospital; and
(B) Report on a form provided by the department:
(i) All contributions received from individual and
corporate donors under § 26-51-518 detailing the manner in which the
contributions received were expended by the rural hospital organization; and
(ii)(a) Any payments made to a third party to
solicit, administer, or manage the contributions received by the rural
hospital organization under this subchapter or § 26-51-518.
(b) Payments made to a third party to solicit,
administer, or manage the contributions received under this subchapter shall
not exceed three percent (3%) of the total amount of the contributions
received by a rural hospital organization.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Contributions to rural hospital organizations.
(a) As used in this section, “rural hospital organization” means an
organization that is approved by the Department of Health under the Helping
Enhance Access to Rural Treatment (HEART) Act, § 20-12-701 et seq.
(b)(1)(A) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in the amount determined under subdivision (b)(1)(B)
of this section for contributions made to a rural hospital organization.
(B) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
credit allowed under this subdivision (b)(1) shall be in the following
amounts:
(i) For an individual or a head of household, the
actual amount contributed;
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
(ii) For a married couple filing a joint return, the
actual amount contributed; or
(iii) For an individual who is a member of a limited
liability company formed under state law, a shareholder of a Subchapter S
corporation, or a partner in a partnership, the amount contributed using
income on which tax was actually paid by the individual under this chapter or
under the Elective Pass-Through Entity Tax Act, § 26-65-101 et seq.
(2) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter for contributions made to a rural hospital
organization by a corporation or other entity in an amount not to exceed the
lesser of the actual amount expended or seventy-five percent (75%) of the
liability of the corporation or other entity under this chapter.
(c)(1) From January 1 to June 30 each taxable year, an individual
taxpayer is limited in the rural hospital organization contributions that are
allowable for credit under this section.
(2) The rural hospital organization contributions approved by
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration for the period
of January 1 to June 30 of a taxable year shall not exceed the following
limits:
(A) For an individual or a head of household, five
thousand dollars ($5,000);
(B) For a married couple filing a joint return, ten
thousand dollars ($10,000); or
(C) For an individual who is a member of a limited
liability company formed under state law, a shareholder of a Subchapter S
corporation, or a partner in a partnership, ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(d)(1) The amount of the income tax credit under this section that may
be claimed by the taxpayer in a tax year shall not exceed the amount of
income tax due by the taxpayer.
(2) Any unused income tax credit under this section may be
carried forward for five (5) consecutive tax years following the tax year in
which the income tax credit was earned.
(3) A taxpayer shall not claim the credit allowed under this
section against prior years’ tax liability.
(e)(1) The aggregate amount of credits allowed under this section
shall not exceed seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) in a taxable
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
year.
(2)(A)(i) Total contributions to an individual rural hospital
organization shall not exceed four million dollars ($4,000,000) in a taxable
year.
(ii) From January 1 to June 30 each taxable year,
the secretary shall not preapprove contributions submitted by:
(a) Individual taxpayers in an amount that
exceeds two million dollars ($2,000,000) to an individual rural hospital
organization; and
(b) Corporate donors in an amount that exceeds
two million dollars ($2,000,000) to an individual rural hospital
organization.
(iii) Subject to the limits otherwise stated in this
subsection, from July 1 to December 31 each taxable year, the secretary shall
approve contributions submitted by individual taxpayers and corporations or
other entities.
(B) If an individual or corporate donor desires to make a
contribution to an individual rural hospital organization that has received
the maximum amount of contributions for that taxable year under this section,
the Department of Health shall provide the individual or corporate donor with
a list, ranked in order of financial need, as determined by the Department of
Health, of rural hospital organizations still eligible to receive
contributions under this section for the taxable year.
(C) If an individual or corporate donor desires to make a
contribution to an unspecified or undesignated rural hospital organization,
either directly to the Department of Health or through a third party that
participates in soliciting, administering, or managing contributions, the
contribution shall be attributed to the rural hospital organization ranked
with the highest financial need by the Department of Health that has not yet
received the maximum amount of contributions for that taxable year,
regardless of whether a third party has a contractual relationship or
agreement with the rural hospital organization.
(D) A third party that participates in soliciting,
advertising, or managing contributions to rural hospital organizations shall
provide the complete list of rural hospital organizations eligible to receive
the credit provided under this section, including their ranking in order of
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
financial need as determined by the Department of Health under the Helping
Enhance Access to Rural Treatment (HEART) Act, § 20-12-701 et seq., to any
potential donor regardless of whether the third party has a contractual
relationship or agreement with the rural hospital organization.
(3)(A) For purposes of subdivisions (e)(1) and (e)(2) of this
section, a rural hospital organization shall notify a potential donor of the
requirements of this section.
(B)(i) Before making a contribution to a rural hospital
organization, a taxpayer shall electronically notify the Department of
Finance and Administration, in a manner specified by the Department of
Finance and Administration, of the total amount of contribution that the
taxpayer intends to make to the rural hospital organization under this
section.
(ii) The secretary shall preapprove or deny the
requested amount within thirty (30) days after receiving the request from the
taxpayer and shall provide written notice to the taxpayer and rural hospital
organization of the preapproval or denial, which shall not require a signed
release or notarized approval by the taxpayer.
(iii) To receive a credit under this section, the
taxpayer shall make the preapproved contribution to the rural hospital
organization within one hundred eighty (180) days after receiving notice from
the secretary that the requested amount was preapproved.
(iv) If a taxpayer does not comply with this
subdivision (e)(3), the secretary shall not include the preapproved
contribution amount when calculating the limits prescribed in subdivision
(e)(1) and (e)(2) of this section.
(4)(A) Preapproval of contributions by the secretary shall be
based solely on the availability of credits under this section.
(B) A taxpayer that is preapproved by the secretary under
this subsection shall retain its preapproval in the event the credit
percentage in this section is modified for the year in which the taxpayer was
preapproved.
(C) Upon the rural hospital organization’s confirmation of
receipt of contributions that have been preapproved by the secretary, a
taxpayer preapproved by the secretary under subdivision (e)(3) of this
section shall receive the full benefit of the credit established by this
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
section even if the rural hospital organization to which the taxpayer made a
contribution does not properly comply with the reports or filings required
under this section.
(5) Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, the Department of
Finance and Administration shall not take any adverse action against donors
to rural hospital organizations under this section if the secretary
preapproved a contribution for a credit under this section before the date
the rural hospital organization is removed from the Department of Health list
under the Helping Enhance Access to Rural Treatment (HEART) Act, § 20-12-701
et seq., and all such contributions shall remain as preapproved credits
subject only to the donor’s compliance with subdivision (e)(3) of this
section.
(f)(1) For a taxpayer to claim a credit under this section, a letter
of confirmation of contribution issued by the rural hospital organization to
which the contribution was made shall be attached to the taxpayer’s tax
return.
(2)(A) If the taxpayer files an electronic return, the
confirmation required under subdivision (f)(1) of this section shall be
required to be electronically attached to the return only if the Internal
Revenue Service allows such attachments when the return is transmitted to the
Department of Finance and Administration.
(B) If a taxpayer files an electronic return and the
confirmation required under subdivision (f)(1) of this section is not
attached because the Internal Revenue Service does not, at the time of the
electronic filing, allow electronic attachments to an Arkansas return, the
confirmation required under subdivision (f)(1) of this section shall be
maintained by the taxpayer and made available upon request by the secretary.
(3) The letter of confirmation of contribution required under
subdivision (f)(1) of this section shall contain the:
(A) Taxpayer’s name;
(B) Taxpayer's address;
(C) Taxpayer's tax identification number;
(D) Amount of the contribution;
(E) Date of the contribution; and
(F) Amount of the credit allowed under this section.
(g) A credit shall not be allowed under this section with respect to
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
any amount deducted from taxable net income by the taxpayer as a charitable
contribution to a bona fide charitable organization qualified under 26 U.S.C.
§ 501(c)(3).
(h) The Department of Finance and Administration shall post the
following information in a prominent location on its website:
(1) All pertinent timelines relating to the credit allowed under
this section, including without limitation the:
(A) Beginning date when contributions can be submitted for
preapproval by donors for the January 1 to June 30 period;
(B) Ending date when contributions can be submitted for
preapproval by donors for the January 1 to June 30 period;
(C) Beginning date when contributions can be submitted for
preapproval by donors for the July 1 to December 31 period;
(D) Ending date when contributions can be submitted for
preapproval by donors for the July 1 to December 31 period; and
(E) Date by which preapproved contributions are required
to be sent to the rural hospital organization;
(2) The list and ranking order of rural hospital organizations
eligible to receive contributions established under the Helping Enhance
Access to Rural Treatment (HEART) Act, § 20-12-701 et seq.;
(3) A monthly progress report, including without limitation the:
(A) Total preapproved contributions under this section to
date by each rural hospital organization;
(B) Total contributions received under this section to
date by each rural hospital organization;
(C) Total aggregate amount of preapproved contributions
made under this section to date; and
(D) Aggregate amount of credits available under this
section; and
(4) A list of all preapproved contributions that were made to an
unspecified or undesignated rural hospital organization and the rural
hospital organizations that received the preapproved contributions.
(i) The Department of Inspector General shall conduct annually an
audit of the tax credit program established under this section, including
without limitation:
(1) The amount and the name of the recipient rural hospital
03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020

HB1674
organization for each contribution made under this section;
(2) All credits received by individual and corporate taxpayers
under this section; and
(3) All amounts received by third parties that solicited,
administered, or managed contributions related to this section and the
Helping Enhance Access to Rural Treatment (HEART) Act, § 20-12-701 et seq.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.



























03/04/2025 2:11:30 PM CEB020